Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.660

Child care services—Declaration of policy.

It shall be the policy of the state of Washington to:

(1) Recognize the family as the most important social and economic unit of society and support the central role parents play in child rearing. All parents are encouraged to care for and nurture their children through the traditional methods of parental care at home. The availability of quality, affordable child care is a concern for working parents, the costs of care are often beyond the resources of working parents, and child care facilities are not located conveniently to workplaces and neighborhoods. Parents are encouraged to participate fully in the effort to improve the quality of child care services.

(2) Promote a variety of culturally and developmentally appropriate child care settings and services of the highest possible quality in accordance with the basic principle of continuity of care. These settings shall include, but not be limited to, family day care homes, outdoor nature-based child care, centers, and schools.

(3) Promote the growth, development and safety of children by working with community groups including providers and parents to establish standards for quality service, training of child care providers, fair and equitable monitoring, and salary levels commensurate with provider responsibilities and support services.

(4) Promote equal access to quality, affordable, socio-economically integrated child care for all children and families.

(5) Facilitate broad community and private sector involvement in the provision of quality child care services to foster economic development and assist industry through the department.

[ 2021 c 304 s 22; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 212; 2006 c 265 s 202; 1989 c 381 s 2; 1988 c 213 s 1. Formerly RCW 43.215.495, 74.13.085.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.

Effective date—2006 c 265: See RCW 43.216.902.

Findings—1989 c 381: "The legislature finds that the increasing difficulty of balancing work life and family needs for parents in the workforce has made the availability of quality, affordable child care a critical concern for the state and its citizens. The prospect for labor shortages resulting from the aging of the population and the importance of the quality of the workforce to the competitiveness of Washington businesses make the availability of quality child care an important concern for the state and its businesses.

The legislature further finds that making information on child care options available to businesses can help the market for child care adjust to the needs of businesses and working families. The legislature further finds that investments are necessary to promote partnerships between the public and private sectors, educational institutions, and local governments to increase the supply, affordability, and quality of child care in the state." [ 1989 c 381 s 1.]

Severability—1989 c 381: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1989 c 381 s 7.]

Severability—1988 c 213: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1988 c 213 s 5.]